Washington statutes.
RCW 36.76.120

Payment of principal and interest.

The county legislative authority must ascertain and levy annually a tax sufficient to pay the interest on all such bonds whenever it becomes due and to meet the annual maturities of principal. The county treasurer must pay out of any money accumulated from the taxes levied to pay the interest as aforesaid, the interest upon all such bonds when it becomes due as provided on the bond or, if coupons are attached to a bond, upon presentation at the place of payment of the proper coupon. Any interest payments or coupons so paid must be reported to the county legislative authority at its first meeting thereafter. Whenever interest is payable at any place other than the city in which the county treasurer keeps his or her office, the county treasurer shall seasonably remit to the state fiscal agent the amount of money required for the payment of any interest which is about to fall due. When any such bonds or any interest is paid, the county treasurer shall suitably and indelibly cancel them.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4125; 1984 c 186 s 33; 1983 c 167 s 92; 1963 c 4 s 36.76.120. Prior: 1913 c 25 s 3; RRS s 5594.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.